Nevada, session 83, SB502.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration the sum of $99,514,255 to support the Division in
carrying out the program of capital improvements as summarized in
this section. The amount is allocated to projects numbered and
described in the Executive Budget for the 2025-2027 biennium or
otherwise described as follows:
Description Project No. Amount
1. Capital Improvements for the Department of Administration:
Intermediate-Care Facility
Building Purchases, Las
Vegas ............................................. 25-C30 $7,500,000
Advance Planning, HVAC and
Site Sanitary Sewer Piping,
Arrowhead Building ....................... 25-P03 $977,919
Advance Planning, State Office
Buildings, Capital Complex ........... 25-P08 $6,234,392
Statewide ADA Program ..................... 25-S02 $6,723,478
Statewide Fire and Life Safety
Program .......................................... 25-S03 $4,068,049
Statewide Advance Planning
Program .......................................... 25-S04 $2,088,656
Statewide Paving Program .................. 25-S05 $5,924,427
Statewide Indoor Air Quality,
Environmental Program ................. 25-S06 $201,838
Statewide Elevator Program ................ 25-S07 $8,093,770
2. Capital Improvements for the State Department of
Agriculture:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Description Project No. Amount
HVAC System Renovation,
Measurement Standards
Building ........................................ 25-M12 $1,359,582
Security Improvements, Interior
Lighting and Power
Distribution, Measurement
Standards Building ....................... 25-M14 $951,046
3. Capital Improvements for the Governor’s Technology
Office:
HVAC System Replacement
and Arc Flash Study, Data
Center ........................................... 25-M13 $750,000
4. Capital Improvements for the Department of Corrections:
Advance Planning, Culinary,
Bakery and Laundry
Building, Northern Nevada
Correctional Center ........................ 25-P01 $2,596,565
Facility Maintenance,
Department of Corrections ........... 25-M04 $7,607,207
Replace Housing Units 9 and 10
Door Locks and Controls,
High Desert State Prison .............. 25-M15 $10,321,349
5. Capital Improvements for the Department of Human
Services:
Facility Maintenance,
Department of Human
Services ........................................ 25-M02 $21,944,899
6. Capital Improvements for the Office of the Military:
Advance Planning, Camp
Washoe Renovation, Nevada
Army National Guard ..................... 25-P05 $1,200,108
Advance Planning, Civil Service
Team Facility, Nevada Army
National Guard ............................... 25-P06 $310,810
Power Distribution and
Lighting, Office of Adjutant
General Building, Lawrence
E. Jacobsen Center ....................... 25-M09 $2,767,516
Re-roof Combined Support
Maintenance Shop 2, Nevada
Army National Guard ................... 25-S01g $574,196
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Description Project No. Amount
Pavement Maintenance and
Rehabilitation, Plumb Lane
Readiness Center .......................... 25-S05g $83,863
7. Capital Improvements for the Nevada System of Higher
Education:
Deferred Maintenance, Nevada
System of Higher Education ........ 25-M01 $237,739
8. Capital Improvements for the Department of Tourism and
Cultural Affairs:
HVAC System Replacement,
Nevada State Museum Las
Vegas ............................................ 25-M22 $2,267,139
9. Capital Improvements for the Department of Veterans
Services:
Chiller Water System
Improvements, Northern
Nevada State Veterans Home ....... 25-M05 $2,845,654
Kitchen Ventilation
Replacement, Southern
Nevada State Veterans Home ....... 25-M18 $1,315,815
Water Softener Replacement,
Southern Nevada Veterans
Home ............................................ 25-M21 $274,054
10. Capital Improvements for the Department of Wildlife:
Residential Water Intrusion
Repairs, Key Pittman
Wildlife Management Area .......... 25-M23 $294,184
Sec. 2. Any remaining balance of any appropriation made by
section 1 of this act must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or
any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration the sum of $9,878,338 to support the Division in
carrying out the program of capital improvements summarized in
this section. The amount is allocated to projects numbered and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
described in the Executive Budget for the 2025-2027 biennium or
otherwise described as follows:
Description Project No. Amount
1. Capital Improvements for the Department of Administration:
Facility Maintenance,
Department of
Administration, Highway
Fund............................................ 25-M03h $4,241,449
Statewide Paving Program,
Highway Fund .............................. 25-S05h $911,014
East Wing Elevator
Modernization, Department
of Motor Vehicles, Carson
City ............................................... 25-S07h $607,760
2. Capital Improvements for the Department of Motor
Vehicles:
Upgrade Interior Lighting,
Department of Motor
Vehicles, Flamingo ...................... 25-M20 $745,652
Replace Surveillance Cameras,
Department of Motor
Vehicles, Sahara ........................... 25-M24 $1,600,751
ADA Site Concrete
Replacement, Department of
Motor Vehicles, Carson City ........ 25-S02h $594,765
3. Capital Improvements for the Department of Public Safety:
Evidence Impound Lot
Expansion, Department of
Public Safety, Training .................. 25-C20 $1,176,947
Sec. 4. Any remaining balance of any appropriation made by
section 3 of this act must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or
any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State Highway
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 5. The amounts appropriated by section 3 of this act from
the State Highway Fund must be allocated by the State Controller as
the money is required for the projects listed in section 3 of this act
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
and must not be transferred to those projects until required to make
contract payments.
Sec. 6. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $799,271,288 for capital improvements summarized in
this section and use proceeds of general obligation bonds of the
State of Nevada previously issued in the amount of $1,692,000
which are reallocated for capital improvements summarized in this
section. The capital improvements summarized in this section are to
be paid with proceeds of general obligation bonds of the State of
Nevada in an amount not to exceed $800,963,288, provided that
$1,692,000 of the proceeds of general obligation bonds of the State
of Nevada issued pursuant to section 6 of chapter 542, Statutes of
Nevada 2019, at page 3309, as amended by section 2 of chapter 3,
Statutes of Nevada 2020, 31st Special Session, at page 18, shall be
reallocated to the capital improvements summarized in this section
and spent before the expenditure of the proceeds of general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada issued pursuant to this
section. The provisions of the State Securities Law, NRS 349.150 to
349.364, inclusive, apply to the bonds authorized by this section. As
used in this section, “proceeds of general obligation bonds” means
amounts received from the sale of an issue of the general obligation
bonds and any accrued interest thereon. The amounts are allocated
to projects numbered and identified in the Executive Budget for the
2025-2027 biennium or otherwise described as follows:
Description Project No. Amount
1. Capital Improvements for the Department of Administration:
Hobart Dam Rehabilitation,
Marlette Lake Water System ......... 25-C05 $14,589,720
State Office Buildings Purchase
and Improvements, Las
Vegas ............................................. 25-C26 $71,157,889
State Office Building Purchase,
Reno .............................................. 25-C27 $22,240,000
Facilities Maintenance,
Department of
Administration .............................. 25-M03 $18,354,424
Building Repairs and West
Plaza Replacement, Nevada
State Library and Archives ........... 25-M08 $12,416,436
Statewide Roofing Program ................ 25-S01 $11,655,718
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Description Project No. Amount
Statewide Fire and Life Safety
Program, Nevada National
Guard ............................................ 25-S03g $4,736,183
2. Capital Improvements for the Governor’s Technology
Office:
HVAC System Replacement
and Arc Flash Study, Data
Center ........................................... 25-M13 $5,000,974
Raised Server Room Floor
Replacement, Data Center ............ 25-M16 $1,698,753
3. Capital Improvements for the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources:
Replacement of Emergency
Spillway Gate and Primary
Outlet Gates, South Fork
Dam .............................................. 25-M10 $1,956,419
4. Capital Improvements for the Department of Corrections:
Recreational Yards Upgrade,
Ely State Prison ............................. 25-C10 $2,814,398
Recreational Yard Enclosure
Replacement, High Desert
State Prison.................................... 25-C11 $6,148,299
Recreational Yard Enclosures,
Lovelock Correctional
Center ............................................ 25-C19 $5,724,454
Facilities Maintenance,
Department of Corrections ........... 25-M04 $26,952,444
Evaporative Cooling
Replacement for Housing
Units 1 – 12, High Desert
State Prison................................... 25-M06 $58,858,210
Underground Piping
Replacement, High Desert
State Prison................................... 25-M07 $22,760,463
Culinary Renovation, Lovelock
Correctional Center ...................... 25-M17 $10,799,516
5. Capital Improvements for the Department of Human
Services:
Southern Nevada Forensic
Facility, Las Vegas ........................ 25-C01 $381,797,319
Desert Regional Center
Facilities, Las Vegas ..................... 25-C02 $38,023,299
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Description Project No. Amount
6. Capital Improvements for the Office of the Military:
Parking Apron Expansion,
Nevada Air National Guard........... 25-C06 $235,660
7. Capital Improvements for the Department of Tourism and
Cultural Affairs:
Humidifier Reverse Osmosis
System, Nevada State
Museum, Las Vegas ..................... 25-M25 $309,152
Replace Fan Coil Units, Nevada
State Museum, Carson City .......... 25-M26 $1,483,713
8. Capital Improvements for the Department of Native
American Affairs:
Exterior Quad Lighting, Stewart
Facility........................................... 25-C21 $427,880
9. Capital Improvements for the Department of Veterans
Services:
North Las Vegas State Veterans
Home ............................................. 25-C03 $78,113,447
Cemetery Committal Building
Utility Extension
Supplemental Funding,
Northern Nevada Veterans
Memorial Cemetery ...................... 25-C08 $2,708,518
Sec. 7. Any remaining balance of the allocated amounts
authorized in section 6 of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2029, and must be reverted to the Bond
Interest and Redemption Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest
and Redemption Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 8. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
State Board of Finance shall issue general obligation bonds of
the State of Nevada in the face amount of not more than $6,718,797,
the proceeds of which must be used for projects identified in this
subsection. The provisions of the State Securities Law, NRS
349.150 to 349.364, inclusive, apply to the bonds authorized by this
subsection. As used in this subsection, “proceeds” means amounts
received from the sale of an issue of the general obligation bonds
and any accrued interest thereon. The amounts are allocated to
projects numbered and identified in the Executive Budget for the
2025-2027 biennium or otherwise described as follows:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Description Project No. Amount
Capital Improvements for the Department of Motor Vehicles:
Central Services and Records
Division Renovation,
Department of Motor
Vehicles, Carson City .................... 25-C17 $4,853,287
Renovate Customer
Counter Casework,
Department of Motor
Vehicles, Decatur ..................... 25-C18 $1,865,510
2. The State Board of Finance shall not issue the bonds
described in subsection 1 unless the Board determines that the
money budgeted or to be budgeted pursuant to subsection 3 will be
sufficient to pay the bond repayment costs of the bonds authorized
by subsection 1. In making its determination under this subsection,
the State Board of Finance shall be entitled to rely on a certification
of the Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor that the money budgeted and to be budgeted pursuant to
subsection 3 will be sufficient to pay the bond repayment costs of
the bonds authorized by subsection 1. Any determination made by
the State Board of Finance under this subsection shall be conclusive.
As used in this subsection, “bond repayment costs” means the
principal of and interest on the bonds and any other costs related to
the payment of the bonds or compliance with covenants made in
connection with those bonds, as estimated by the State Treasurer.
3. The Legislature intends that the annual bond repayment
costs of the bonds authorized by subsection 1, and any bonds
directly or indirectly, through a series of refundings, refunding those
bonds, will be paid from annually available money in the State
Highway Fund. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office
of the Governor is hereby directed to budget for payment of such
bond repayment costs from the State Highway Fund in each budget
or other spending plan presented to the Legislature for the
expenditure of amounts in the State Highway Fund after the
effective date of this section until the bonds authorized by
subsection 1 and any bonds directly or indirectly refunding those
bonds are no longer outstanding. The money so budgeted to pay the
annual bond repayment costs of the bonds authorized by subsection
1, and any bonds directly or indirectly, through a series of
refundings, refunding those bonds, is hereby appropriated in each
year to the Consolidated Bond Interest and Redemption Fund to pay
such bond repayment costs. As used in this subsection, “annually
available money in the State Highway Fund” means money
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
remaining in the State Highway Fund in any year after all amounts
required to pay bonds issued pursuant to NRS 408.273 in that year
have been paid or provision for such payment has been made.
Sec. 9. Any remaining balance of the allocated amounts
authorized in section 8 of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2029, and must be reverted to the Bond
Interest and Redemption Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest
and Redemption Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 10. 1. The State Board of Finance may issue the bonds
authorized pursuant to sections 6 and 8 of this act at the time
deemed appropriate by the Board based on the schedule established
for the completion of the projects described in those sections.
2. The State Controller may advance temporarily from the
State General Fund, upon the approval of the Director of the Office
of Finance in the Office of the Governor, to the State Public Works
Division of the Department of Administration, until the date on
which the bonds authorized by section 6 of this act are sold,
amounts necessary to facilitate, as applicable, the purchase of
buildings or the start of the projects enumerated in section 6 of this
act. The amounts temporarily advanced by the State Controller must
be advanced as the money is required for the projects and must not
be transferred to the projects from the State General Fund until
required to make contract payments. The advanced amounts must be
repaid immediately to the State General Fund upon the issuance of
the bonds or not later than the last business day in August
immediately following the end of the fiscal year during which the
advance is made.
3. The State Controller may advance temporarily from the
State Highway Fund, upon the approval of the Director of the Office
of Finance in the Office of the Governor, to the State Public Works
Division of the Department of Administration, until the date on
which the bonds authorized by section 8 of this act are sold,
amounts necessary to facilitate the start of the projects enumerated
in section 8 of this act. The amounts temporarily advanced by the
State Controller must be advanced as the money is required for the
projects and must not be transferred to the projects from the State
Highway Fund until required to make contract payments. The
advanced amounts must be repaid immediately to the State Highway
Fund upon the issuance of the bonds or not later than the last
business day in August immediately following the end of the fiscal
year during which the advance is made.
4. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor shall provide written notification to the State Controller,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
the State Treasurer and the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts of
the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
of the approval of any advance from the State General Fund or the
State Highway Fund to the State Public Works Division of the
Department of Administration pursuant to subsection 2 or 3. The
Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor shall
provide a reconciliation to the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts
of the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of
any advance authorized from the State General Fund or the State
Highway Fund pursuant to subsection 2 or 3 and any repayment of
such an advance to the State General Fund or the State Highway
Fund made during any fiscal year during the 2025-2027 biennium.
The reconciliation must be provided not later than the last business
day in August immediately following the end of the fiscal year
during which an advance is made.
Sec. 11. 1. The State Public Works Division of the
Department of Administration shall transfer the sum of $11,762,261
from the amount appropriated by section 1 of chapter 1, Statutes of
Nevada 2023, 34th Special Session, at page 1, for the project
numbered and described in the Executive Budget for the 2023-2025
biennium or otherwise described as Project 23-P01, Advance
Planning: Headquarters Building, Carson City, Department of
Public Safety, to the project as authorized in subsection 2.
2. The State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration shall use the $11,762,261 transferred pursuant to
subsection 1 to support the Division in carrying out the program of
capital improvement for the project described in the Executive
Budget for the 2025-2027 biennium or otherwise described as
Project 25-M01, Deferred Maintenance, Nevada System of Higher
Education.
Sec. 12. Any remaining balance of the amount transferred
pursuant to section 11 of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2029, and must be reverted to the State
General Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 13. 1. Expenditure of the following sums not
appropriated from the State General Fund or the State Highway
Fund is hereby authorized for the following projects numbered and
described in the Executive Budget for the 2025-2027 biennium or
otherwise described as follows:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
Description Project No. Amount
Capital Improvements for the Department of Administration:
Statewide Fire and Life Safety
Program, Nevada National
Guard ............................................ 25-S03g $4,301,549
Statewide Indoor Air Quality,
Environmental Program ................. 25-S06 $100,000
Statewide Building Official
Program .......................................... 25-S09 $4,000,000
Capital Improvements for the Office of the Military:
Parking Apron Expansion,
Nevada Air National Guard........... 25-C06 $8,942,120
Advance Planning, Camp
Washoe Renovation, Nevada
Army National Guard ..................... 25-P05 $910,568
Advance Planning, Civil Service
Team Facility, Nevada Army
National Guard ............................... 25-P06 $590,000
Power Distribution and
Lighting, Office of Adjutant
General Building, Lawrence
E. Jacobsen Center ....................... 25-M09 $908,229
Re-roof Combined Support
Maintenance Shop 2, Nevada
Army National Guard ................... 25-S01g $529,269
Pavement Maintenance and
Rehabilitation, Plumb Lane
Readiness Center .......................... 25-S05g $191,641
Capital Improvements for the Department of Veterans Services:
North Las Vegas State Veterans
Home ............................................. 25-C03 $145,067,830
2. The State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration shall not execute a contract for the construction of a
project listed in subsection 1 until the Division has determined that
the funding authorized in subsection 1 for the project has been
awarded or received and is available for expenditure for the project.
Sec. 14. The State Public Works Division of the Department
of Administration shall carry out the provisions of sections 1, 3, 6,
8, 13 and 25 of this act as provided in chapter 341 of NRS. The
Division shall ensure that qualified persons are employed to
accomplish the authorized work. Every contract pertaining to the
work must be approved by the Attorney General.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Sec. 15. All state and local governmental agencies involved in
the design and construction of the projects enumerated in sections 1,
3, 6, 8, 13 and 25 of this act shall cooperate with the State Public
Works Division of the Department of Administration to expedite
completion of the project.
Sec. 16. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $6,000,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium as provided in
NRS 383.530, the proceeds of which must be used for the program
for awarding financial assistance to pay the actual expenses of
preserving or protecting historical buildings to be used to develop a
network of cultural centers and activities.
2. As used in this section, “proceeds” means amounts received
from the sale of an issue of the general obligation bonds and any
accrued interest thereon.
Sec. 17. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $10,500,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium, the proceeds of
which must be used for the purposes described in section 1 of
Senate Bill No. 83 of this session.
2. As used in this section, “proceeds” means amounts received
from the sale of an issue of the general obligation bonds and any
accrued interest thereon.
Sec. 18. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $33,900,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium as provided in
NRS 349.986, the proceeds of which must be used for the program
for providing grants for water conservation and capital
improvements to certain water systems.
2. As used in this section, “proceeds” means amounts received
from the sale of an issue of the general obligation bonds and any
accrued interest thereon.
Sec. 19. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $63,400,000 in the 2025-2027 biennium, the proceeds of
which must be used for the purposes described in:
1. Subsection 1 of section 2;
2. Subsection 2 of section 2;
3. Subsection 3 of section 2;
4. Subsection 4 of section 2;
5. Subsection 5 of section 2;
6. Subsection 7 of section 2;
7. Subsection 8 of section 2;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
8. Subsection 9 of section 2;
9. Subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 10 of
section 2;
10. Subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 10 of
section 2;
11. Subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 10 of
section 2;
12. Subparagraph (4) of paragraph (a) of subsection 10 of
section 2;
13. Subparagraph (5) of paragraph (a) of subsection 10 of
section 2; and
14. Paragraph (b) of subsection 10 of section 2,
 of chapter 480, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 2861. As used
in this section, “proceeds” means amounts received from the sale of
an issue of the general obligation bonds and any accrued interest
thereon.
Sec. 20. The Legislature finds and declares that the issuance of
securities and the incurrence of indebtedness pursuant to sections
17, 18 and 19 of this act, except the use of the proceeds of those
bonds pursuant to subsections 3, 5, 11 and 14 of section 19 of this
act:
1. Are necessary for the protection and preservation of the
property and natural resources of this State and for the purpose of
obtaining the benefits thereof; and
2. Constitute an exercise of the authority conferred by the
second paragraph of Section 3 of Article 9 of the Nevada
Constitution.
Sec. 21. 1. An ad valorem tax of 16.18 cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property is hereby levied for Fiscal
Year 2025-2026, and an ad valorem tax of 16.18 cents on each $100
of assessed valuation of taxable property is hereby levied for Fiscal
Year 2026-2027. The taxes levied must be collected in the manner
provided in chapter 361 of NRS on all taxable property in this State,
including, without limitation, the net proceeds of minerals, and
excluding such property as is by law exempt from taxation.
Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 361.453 to the contrary,
1.18 cents of the levies imposed pursuant to this subsection must not
be included in calculating the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of
NRS 361.453 on the total ad valorem tax levied for all public
purposes.
2. An ad valorem tax of 0.82 cents on each $100 of assessed
valuation of taxable property is hereby levied for Fiscal Year 2025-
2026, and an ad valorem tax of 0.82 cents on each $100 of assessed
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
valuation of taxable property is hereby levied for Fiscal Year 2026-
2027. The taxes levied must be collected in the manner provided in
chapter 361 of NRS on all taxable property in this State, including,
without limitation, the net proceeds of minerals, and excluding such
property as is by law exempt from taxation. The proceeds of the
taxes levied pursuant to this subsection must be used exclusively for
the repayment of bonded indebtedness issued pursuant to the
provisions of:
(a) Chapter 6, Statutes of Nevada 2001, 17th Special Session, at
page 104; or
(b) Chapter 480, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 2860.
 Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 361.453 to the contrary,
the levies imposed pursuant to this subsection must not be included
in calculating the limitation set forth in subsection 1 of NRS
361.453 on the total ad valorem tax levied for all public purposes.
3. The proceeds of the taxes levied by this section are hereby
appropriated in each fiscal year to the Consolidated Bond Interest
and Redemption Fund to discharge the obligations of the State of
Nevada as they are respectively due in that fiscal year. Any balance
of the money appropriated by this subsection remaining at the end of
the respective fiscal years does not revert to the State General Fund.
Sec. 22. 1. On or before July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026,
respectively, the State Treasurer shall estimate the amount of
proceeds of the taxes levied by section 21 of this act. If the sum of
that estimate and the balance of ad valorem reserves in the
Consolidated Bond Interest and Redemption Fund is less than the
total obligation of the State of Nevada for payment of the interest on
and principal of bonds which will become due in the fiscal year, the
State Treasurer shall request the State Controller to reserve in
the State General Fund an amount which is sufficient to pay the
remainder of the total obligation. The State Treasurer may revise the
estimate and amount reserved.
2. If the money in the Consolidated Bond Interest and
Redemption Fund is insufficient to pay those obligations as they
become due, the State Controller shall cause the money in reserve to
be transferred from the State General Fund to the Consolidated
Bond Interest and Redemption Fund. The amount reserved is hereby
contingently appropriated for that purpose. Any balance of the sums
transferred pursuant to this subsection remaining at the end of the
respective fiscal years must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30 of the respective fiscal years and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 18, 2026, and
September 17, 2027, respectively.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
3. The State Treasurer shall report to the Legislature or, if the
Legislature is not in session, to the Interim Finance Committee:
(a) The amount of any estimate made pursuant to subsection 1
and the amount of money reserved in the State General Fund based
upon the estimate;
(b) The amount of money transferred from the State General
Fund pursuant to subsection 2; and
(c) The amount of money which reverts to the State General
Fund pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 23. The State Board of Finance, in its capacity as the
State General Obligation Bond Commission and to the extent that
money is available, shall pay the expenses related to the issuance of
general obligation bonds approved by the 83rd Session of the
Nevada Legislature from the proceeds of those bonds.
Sec. 24. 1. Expenditure of the following sums not
appropriated from the State General Fund or the State Highway
Fund is hereby authorized from the Consolidated Bond Interest and
Redemption Fund in the amount of $180,892,046 for Fiscal Year
2025-2026, and in the amount of $180,634,198 for Fiscal Year
2026-2027.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of NRS
353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance Committee is not
required for any request for the revision of a work program for the
Bond Interest and Redemption Account in the Consolidated Bond
Interest and Redemption Fund for the bond repayment costs of the
bonds approved pursuant to the provisions of this act. As used in
this subsection, “bond repayment costs” means the principal,
interest and related costs of issuance of the bonds and any other
costs related to the payment of the bonds or compliance with
covenants made in connection with those bonds, as estimated by the
State Treasurer.
Sec. 25. 1. With the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee, the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration may transfer appropriated, allocated and authorized
money from one project to another within the same agency for those
projects listed in sections 1, 3, 6 and 8 of this act.
2. Transfers of money pursuant to subsection 1 to or from
projects that are also authorized by section 13 of this act must
maintain the overall ratio of appropriated, allocated and authorized
money in total for those projects unless such a transfer jeopardizes
the receipts of the money from those other sources authorized by
section 13 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Sec. 26. 1. The money collected pursuant to the annual tax
on slot machines imposed pursuant to NRS 463.385 that is
distributed to the Special Capital Construction Fund for Higher
Education, except any amount of that money which is needed to pay
the principal and interest on bonds, is appropriated to the State
Public Works Division of the Department of Administration in the
sum of $3,000,000 for the project numbered and described in the
Executive Budget for the 2025-2027 biennium or otherwise
described as project 25-M01, Deferred Maintenance, Nevada
System of Higher Education.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the Special Capital
Construction Fund for Higher Education on or before September 21,
2029.
Sec. 27. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Legislative Fund created by NRS 218A.150 the sum of
$33,859,402 for capital improvement projects for facilities.
Sec. 28. 1. The State Board of Finance shall issue general
obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in the face amount of not
more than $191,869,942 in the 2025-2027 biennium, the proceeds of
which must be used for capital improvement projects for the
Legislative Department. The provisions of the State Securities Law,
NRS 349.150 to 349.364, inclusive, apply to the bonds authorized
by this subsection. As used in this subsection, “proceeds” means
amounts received from the sale of an issue of the general obligation
bonds and any accrued interest thereon.
2. All state and local governmental agencies involved in the
design and construction of the capital improvement projects for the
Legislative Department described in this act shall cooperate with
the Legislative Department to expedite completion of the projects.
3. Any remaining balance of the allocated amount authorized
in subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, and must be reverted to the Bond Interest and Redemption
Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest and Redemption Fund on
or before September 21, 2029.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
Sec. 29. 1. The State Board of Finance may issue the bonds
authorized pursuant to section 28 of this act at the time deemed
appropriate by the Board based on the schedule established for the
completion of the capital improvement projects described in that
section.
2. The State Controller may advance temporarily from the
State General Fund, upon the request of the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, to the Legislative Fund until the date
on which the bonds authorized by section 28 of this act are sold,
amounts necessary to facilitate the start of the capital improvement
projects described in section 28 of this act. The amounts temporarily
advanced by the State Controller must be advanced as the money is
required for the projects and must not be transferred to the
Legislative Fund from the State General Fund until required to make
contract payments. The advanced amounts must be repaid
immediately to the State General Fund upon the issuance of the
bonds or not later than the last business day in August immediately
following the end of the fiscal year during which the advance is
made.
3. The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau shall
provide written notification to the State Controller, the State
Treasurer and the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts of the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of the approval
of any advance from the State General Fund to the Legislative Fund
pursuant to subsection 2. The Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau shall provide a reconciliation to the Legislative Commission
and the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts of the Fiscal Analysis
Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of the advances
authorized from the State General Fund pursuant to subsection 2 and
repayments to the State General Fund of such an advance made
during any fiscal year during the 2025-2027 biennium. The
reconciliation must be provided not later than the last business day
in August immediately following the end of the fiscal year during
which an advance is made.
Sec. 30. If bonds for projects described in section 28 and
either section 6 or 8 of this act are proposed for issuance at the same
meeting of the State Board of Finance, the State Board of Finance
shall approve a single issuance of bonds in one or more series for all
such projects and may not vote separately upon projects described in
such sections. Approval of the issuance of bonds for projects
described in one such section shall be deemed approval for the
issuance of bonds for projects described in the other such sections
proposed at the same meeting.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Sec. 31. Section 7 of chapter 542, Statutes of Nevada 2019, as
amended by chapter 1, Statutes of Nevada 2023, 34th Special
Session, at page 15, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 7. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
[subsection] subsections 2 [,] and 3, any remaining balance
of the allocated amounts authorized in section 6 of chapter
542, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3309, as amended by
section 2 of chapter 3, Statutes of Nevada 2020, 31st Special
Session, at page 18, must:
(a) Not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2023,
and must be reverted to the Bond Interest and Redemption
Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest and Redemption
Fund on or before September 15, 2023; or
(b) Transferred for the projects numbered and described
in the Executive Budget for the 2023-2025 biennium or
otherwise described in section 6 of chapter 542, Statutes of
Nevada 2019, at page 3309, as amended by section 2 of
chapter 3, Statutes of Nevada 2020, 31st Special Session, at
page 18.
2. Any remaining balance of the allocated amounts
authorized in section 6 of chapter 542, Statutes of Nevada
2019, at page 3309, as amended by section 2 of chapter 3,
Statutes of Nevada 2020, 31st Special Session, at page 18, for
the following projects, must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2025, and must [be] :
(a) Be reverted to the Bond Interest and Redemption
Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest and Redemption
Fund on or before September 19, 2025 [.] ; or
(b) Be transferred for the projects numbered and
described in the Executive Budget for the 2025-2027
biennium or otherwise described in section 6 of this act.
Description Project No.
[Marlette Lake Dam
Rehabilitation, Marlette Lake
Water System ..................................... 19-C08]
Renovation of Collections
Storage Building 19, Stewart
Campus .............................................. 19-C16
Replace Freezer, Purchasing
Warehouse .......................................... 19-M01
Emergency Generator and Service
Entrance Upgrade, Reno
Purchasing Warehouse ....................... 19-M07
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Description Project No.
Central Plant Renovation, Paul
Laxalt State Office Building .............. 19-M29
HVAC Systems Renovation,
Washoe County Armory .................... 19-M31
[Construct Water Wells and
Water Systems, Wildlife
Management Area Sites ..................... 19-M40]
Cemetery Expansion, Southern
Nevada Veterans Memorial
Cemetery ............................................ 19-C03
Underground Piping and Boiler
Replacement, Lovelock
Correctional Center ........................... 19-M10
Statewide ADA Program ........................ 19-S02
3. Any remaining balance of the allocated amounts
authorized in section 6 of chapter 542, Statutes of Nevada
2019, at page 3309, as amended by section 2 of chapter 3,
Statutes of Nevada 2020, 31st Special Session, at page 18,
for the following projects, must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the
Bond Interest and Redemption Account in the Consolidated
Bond Interest and Redemption Fund on or before
September 17, 2027:
Description Project No.
Marlette Lake Dam
Rehabilitation, Marlette Lake
Water System ..................................... 19-C08
Construct Water Wells and
Water Systems, Wildlife
Management Area Sites .................... 19-M40
Sec. 32. Section 5 of chapter 466, Statutes of Nevada 2021, as
amended by chapter 1, Statutes of Nevada 2023, 34th Special
Session, at page 16, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, any remaining balance of the allocated amounts authorized
in section 4 of chapter 466, Statutes of Nevada 2021, at page
2880, must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2025, and must be reverted to the Bond Interest and
Redemption Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest and
Redemption Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
2. Any remaining balance of the allocated amounts
authorized in section 4 of chapter 466, Statutes of Nevada
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
2021, at page 2880, for [project 21-C03, Washoe County
Training Center Addition, Nevada Army National Guard,] the
following projects must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the Bond Interest
and Redemption Account in the Consolidated Bond Interest
and Redemption Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Description Project No.
Heavy Equipment Repair Shop
and Shop Renovation,
Northern Region 2
Headquarters, Elko ........................... 21-C01
Washoe County Training Center
Addition, Nevada Army
National Guard ................................. 21-C03
Hobart Reservoir Dam
Rehabilitation, Marlette Lake
Water System ..................................... 21-C06
Aircraft Storage Hangar and
Sitework, Harry Reid
Training Center ................................. 21-C10
Loading Dock, North Las Vegas
Readiness Center ............................... 21-E01
Deferred Maintenance,
Department of Health and
Human Services ................................ 21-M02
Construct Water Wells and
Water Systems, Various Fish
Hatchery Sites ................................... 21-M08
Uninterruptible Power Supply
and Temperature Control
System Upgrade, Bryan
Building ............................................. 21-M11
Elevator Modernization, EICON
Building ............................................. 21-M12
HVAC Systems Renovation,
Carlin Readiness Center ................... 21-M19
Replace Domestic Water
Heaters, Carlin Readiness
Center ................................................ 21-M27
Housing Unit 4 HVAC System
Renovation, Northern Nevada
Correctional Center ........................... 21-M30
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
Description Project No.
Domestic Hot Water System and
Transformer Replacement,
Office of the Adjutant
General .............................................. 21-M43
Exterior Renovation, State
Capitol and Annex Building ............. 21-M46
Safety Improvements, Miller
Point Overlook ................................... 21-M50
Replace Locks and Controls
Housing Unit 7, Northern
Nevada Correctional Center ............. 21-M58
Replace Cell Doors and Locks in
Housing Units 4 - 6, Northern
Nevada Correctional Center ............. 21-M60
Advance Planning: General
Instruction Building, Floyd
Edsall Training Center ..................... 21-P05
Statewide Paving Program ..................... 21-S05
Sec. 33. The project numbered and described in the Executive
Budget for the 2023-2025 biennium or otherwise described in
section 6 of chapter 1, Statutes of Nevada 2023, 34th Special
Session, at page 7, as Project 23-C33, Southern Nevada Small Arms
Range, Nevada Army National Guard is hereby cancelled in
accordance with paragraph (j) of subsection 1 of NRS 341.145.
Sec. 34. 1. This section and sections 1 to 16, inclusive, and
18 to 33, inclusive, of this act become effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 17 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, if
and only if Senate Bill No. 83 of this session is enacted by the
Legislature and approved by the Governor.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)